Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 1

General Provisions

4-6-101. Charitable institutions free from charters.

All charitable institutions owned and operated by the state are declared to be a part of the state government, and shall be operated and maintained as such, free from the control of any charter of incorporation, or any portion of any act of the general assembly for incorporation.

Acts 1923, ch. 105, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 2677a1; Code 1932, § 4566; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-601.

Cross-References. Applicability of chapter to prison contractors providing correctional services, §41-24-111.

4-6-102. Penitentiaries for adults — Management by department of correction.

The management and government of the state penitentiaries for adults are vested in the department of correction. It has all the power necessary for the full and efficient exercise of the executive, administrative, and fiscal supervision over all such institutions, except as otherwise expressly provided.

Acts 1919, ch. 39, § 2; impl. am. Acts 1921, ch. 4, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1923, ch. 7, § 42; Shan. Supp., § 312b2; mod. Code 1932, § 371; impl. am. Acts 1935, ch. 186, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 371; impl. am. Acts 1953, ch. 27, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1955, ch. 102, § 1; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-602; Acts 1989, ch. 278, § 22.

Cross-References. Condemnation of land for water and sewage systems, §12-1-109.

Department of correction generally, title 4, ch. 3, part 6.

Penal and reformatory institutions, title 41.

4-6-103. Wardens and superintendents — Appointment.

The state penitentiary shall be under the immediate executive control and management of a warden, and each of the other penal, reformatory or charitable institutions of the state shall be under the executive control and management of a superintendent, all subject to the rules and regulations of the department vested with control of such institution and this chapter, the superintendents and wardens to be appointed by the commissioner vested with the administration of such institutions, with the approval of the governor.

Acts 1919, ch. 39, § 8; 1921, ch. 1, § 2; impl. am. Acts 1923, ch. 7, §§ 1, 2, 5, 42; Shan. Supp., § 312b10; Code 1932, § 379; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-610.

Code Commission Notes.

The former language “and the Brushy Mountain state penitentiary” following “The state penitentiary” was deleted as obsolete by the Code Commission in 2015, as the prison no longer exists.

Cross-References. Appointment of professional staff and employees, §41-1-102.

Warden of state penitentiary, §41-1-104.

4-6-104. Salaries of wardens and superintendents.

The warden of the state penitentiary shall receive a salary payable monthly upon the warrant of the commissioner of finance and administration.

The salaries of all superintendents shall be fixed by the commissioner vested with the administration of the respective institutions, unless otherwise fixed by law before the appointment of such superintendent, and the same shall not be changed during their terms of office.

The commissioner shall file with the commissioner of finance and administration a statement in writing showing the salaries of such other superintendents, and the same shall be paid monthly upon the warrant of the commissioner of finance and administration.

Acts 1919, ch. 39, § 9; impl. am. Acts 1923, ch. 7, §§ 1, 2, 6, 42; Shan. Supp., § 312b12; Code 1932, § 381; impl. am. Acts 1937, ch. 33, §§ 7, 24; C. Supp. 1950, § 381; modified; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-611.

Code Commission Notes.

The former language “and the warden of the Brushy Mountain state penitentiary, respectively, shall each” following “The warden of the state penitentiary” in (a) was deleted as obsolete by the Code Commission in 2015, as the prison no longer exists.

4-6-105. No impairment, interruption or diminution of employee rights, salary, benefits, leave accumulation or employment on transfer of career service employees to the department of correction.

The initial transfer of any career service employee pursuant to the transfer of probation and parole field services and the administration of the community corrections program from the board of parole to the department of correction shall not result in any impairment, interruption or diminution of employee rights, salary, benefits, leave accumulation or employment. The commissioner of human resources is authorized to determine if there has been any impairment of rights, salary, benefits, leave accumulation or employment as a result of the initial transfer. Any career service employee may seek redress of any such determination through a request for declaratory order by the commissioner of human resources pursuant to §4-5-223.

Acts 2012, ch. 727, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Former §4-6-105 (Acts 1977, ch. 112, § 4; T.C.A., § 4-612), concerning the director of institutional farms, was repealed by Acts 1999, ch. 390, § 2, effective June 16, 1999.

For the preamble to the act concerning transfers of certain functions relating to probation and parole services and the community correction grant program from the board of probation and parole to the department of correction, please refer to Acts 2012, ch. 727.

Acts 2012, ch. 727, § 63 provided that the implementation of the act, which enacted this section, shall be fully accomplished on or before January 1, 2013.

4-6-106. Compensation plan for correctional officers.

The commissioner of correction shall formulate and implement a compensation plan for correctional officers by which such officers are paid at least the average compensation of correctional officers in the southeastern United States with similar qualifications and years of service. Such plan shall be revised annually to reflect changes in the southeast average compensation. The commissioner shall report annually to the general assembly on the components and ranges in such plan. Such compensation plan shall only be implemented in years in which funds are appropriated to pay the average compensation as determined by such survey.

Acts 2005, ch. 418, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former §4-6-106 (Acts 1919, ch. 39, § 11; Shan. Supp., § 312b16; Code 1932, § 385; T.C.A. § 4-614), concerning residences and supplies of institutional employees, was repealed by Acts 1980, ch. 755, § 2.

4-6-107. Commissioner's authority over officers of penitentiaries — Presumption in favor of commissioner.

The commissioner shall make rules for the prosecution of the commissioner's powers and may require the performance of additional duties by the officers of the penitentiaries named in § 4-6-102, so as to fully meet the requirements, intents and purposes of this chapter, and particularly those relating to the making of estimates and furnishing proper proof of the use made of all articles furnished or produced at such penitentiaries.

In case of an apparent conflict between the powers conferred by law upon any warden or superintendent and those conferred by this chapter, upon the commissioner, the presumption shall be conclusive in favor of the commissioner.

Acts 1919, ch. 39, § 12; impl. am. Acts 1923, ch. 7, §§ 1, 2, 42; Shan. Supp., § 312b17; Code 1932, § 386; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-615.

4-6-108. Matron of penitentiary.

The matron of the state penitentiary shall be appointed by the commissioner of correction, and shall receive a salary, payable monthly upon the warrant of the commissioner of finance and administration.

It is the matron's duty to look after the moral conduct and general welfare of the female inmates, and to perform such other duties as may be required by the commissioner.

Acts 1919, ch. 39, § 10; impl. am. Acts 1923, ch. 7, §§ 1, 2, 42; Shan. Supp., § 312b15; Code 1932, § 384; Acts 1933, ch. 159, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1937, ch. 33, § 24; C. Supp. 1950, § 384; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-618.

4-6-109. Hospitalization of inmates.

Whenever, in the judgment of the physician or physicians in charge of any of the charitable or penal institutions of the state, it becomes necessary to perform an operation or give special treatment or care to any inmate of any such institution, if the institution is not equipped for the performance of the operation or to give special treatment, the physician in charge of such institution may, with the approval of the commissioner vested with the administration of such institution, have such inmate placed in a first-class hospital of the state where the inmate may have the necessary operation, hospitalization, care and treatment.

Acts 1943, ch. 32, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 382.1; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-619.

4-6-110. Dentists — Appointment and removal.

The commissioner of the department having control of the state prisons shall appoint a dentist, or may appoint dentists, whose duty it is to do the necessary dental work for the inmates of such of these institutions as may be under the commissioner's administration. Such dentist or dentists may at any time be removed by the commissioner for just cause. Only dentists who are licensed to practice dentistry in this state shall be eligible for appointment. Such appointment may be by employment in the department or by contract for services.

Acts 1919, ch. 173, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1919, ch. 17, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1921, ch. 4, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1923, ch. 7, §§ 1, 2, 3, 5, 42; Shan. Supp., § 2642a54; mod. Code 1932, § 4567; impl. am. Acts 1955, ch. 17, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1955, ch. 220, § 1; modified; impl. am. Acts 1971, ch. 90, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1971, ch. 131, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-620; Acts 2003, ch. 355, § 21; 2012, ch. 1026, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 355, § 66 provided that no expenditure of public funds pursuant to the act shall be made in violation of the provisions of Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964, as codified in 42 U.S.C. § 2000d.

Cross-References. Supervision of dentists and dental equipment by commissioner of health, §68-1-303.

4-6-111. Dentists — Facilities.

The superintendent of each of the institutions specified in §4-6-110 shall provide a suitable room for the dentist, with all necessary equipment, with the approval of the commissioner, and the same shall be paid for out of the funds appropriated for the maintenance of the institution for which the equipment is purchased.

Acts 1919, ch. 173, § 2; impl. am. Acts 1923, ch. 7, §§ 1, 2, 3, 42; Shan. Supp., § 2642a55; Code 1932, § 4568; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-621.

4-6-112. Dentists — Duties.

It is the duty of dentists appointed pursuant to § 4-6-110 to inspect at regular intervals the teeth of each inmate of the institutions specified in § 4-6-110, and to keep a record of the work necessary to be done on the teeth of each inmate for the protection and preservation of the health of the inmate. So much of the necessary work shall be done by the dentist as possible.

Work that is not necessary for the protection and preservation of the health of an inmate shall not be done by such dentists.

Preference shall at all times be given by such dentists to inmates who are being supported in the institutions specified in § 4-6-110 at the expense of the state or county.

All other dental work except that set out in subsections (a)-(c) may be done by the dentist for inmates who are not being supported by the state or county, and the work done for any such paying inmate must be paid for by the inmate or by the person or persons paying for the support of such inmate in the institution, a reasonable charge to be made for such work and payment to be made to the superintendent who shall apply the same as other income of the institution is applied.

Such dentists shall at no time do any work for any officer or employee of any of such institutions.

Acts 1919, ch. 173, § 3; Shan. Supp., § 2642a56; Code 1932, § 4569; Acts 1945, ch. 93, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 4569; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-622.

4-6-113. Dentists — Compensation.

Each dentist appointed pursuant to §4-6-110 shall receive compensation as fixed by the commissioner, subject to the approval of the department of revenue, payable monthly, and shall receive necessary traveling expenses, when required to make a trip by the commissioner, and shall in addition be provided with a room and board at each of such institutions.

Acts 1919, ch. 173, § 4; impl. am. Acts 1923, ch. 7, §§ 1, 2, 6, 42; Shan. Supp., § 2642a57; mod. Code 1932, § 4570; modified; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 14; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-623.

Compiler's Notes. This section may be affected by §9-1-116, concerning entitlement to funds, absent appropriation.

4-6-114. Architects and construction supervisors.

The commissioner vested with the administration of the institutions named in §4-6-102 may employ an architect or architects skilled in methods of sanitation and the preparations of plans, specifications, estimates and details for buildings, betterments and such items of equipment as may be required in any of those institutions, and also employ such mechanical engineers, superintendents and supervisors as the commissioner may deem necessary, and fix their titles and compensations, which, with all necessary expenses, when itemized and approved, shall be paid like other expenses of the department.

Acts 1919, ch. 39, § 16; impl. am. Acts 1923, ch. 7, §§ 1, 2, 42; Shan. Supp., § 312b22; Code 1932, § 391; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-624.

4-6-115. Detail of construction personnel between penitentiaries.

The commissioner of correction has the authority to detail any engineer or skilled worker connected with the main prison or other penitentiaries under the commissioner's control for special service at the other penitentiaries named in §4-6-102. Services thus rendered and the expense thereof shall be paid by the penitentiary for which the work is performed to the penitentiary furnishing same, such sum as may be fixed by the commissioner.

Acts 1919, ch. 39, § 17; impl. am. Acts 1923, ch. 7, §§ 1, 2, 42; Shan. Supp., § 312b23; Code 1932, § 392; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-625.

Compiler's Notes. This section may be affected by §9-1-116, concerning entitlement to funds, absent appropriation.

4-6-116. Accounts — Auditing — Reports.

The commissioner of correction shall keep in the commissioner's office a proper and complete set of books and accounts with each penitentiary named in § 4-6-102, which shall clearly show the nature and amount of every expenditure authorized and made at such penitentiary, the receipts from the expenditure, and contain an account of all appropriations made by the general assembly and of all other funds with the disposition thereof.

The department of finance and administration shall prescribe the form of vouchers, records and methods of keeping accounts at each of the penitentiaries, which shall be as nearly uniform as possible.

The commissioner has the right and power to examine the records of each penitentiary at any time, and has the power to authorize its bookkeeper, accountant, or any other employee to examine and check the records, accounts and vouchers, or take an inventory of the property of any penitentiary, or to do whatever may be necessary, and to pay the actual and reasonable expenses incurred in such service upon an itemized account thereof being filed and approved.

It is the duty of the commissioner to cause to be examined and audited the books of the different penitentiaries under the commissioner's supervision at least once in each year, and as often as may be necessary.

It is the duty of the comptroller of the treasury to make such expert examinations when called upon to do so by the commissioner.

The officers of such penitentiaries must permit such examinations and auditing and must, upon demand, produce all books, contracts and papers in their respective offices, without unnecessary delay, and must furnish, upon demand, the information touching the books, papers, and contracts and other matter pertaining to their respective offices.

When the examinations are made, reports thereof shall be made in duplicate, one (1) copy of which shall be filed with the governor, and the other with the commissioner of finance and administration.

Acts 1919, ch. 39, § 19; impl. am. Acts 1923, ch. 7, §§ 1, 2, 42; Shan. Supp., § 312b25; Code 1932, § 394; impl. am. Acts 1937, ch. 33, §§ 5, 24; C. Supp. 1950, § 394; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 3; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-627.

4-6-117. Monthly reports of receipts and expenditures.

It is the duty of each warden and superintendent to make to the commissioner of correction a monthly statement showing the entire amount received by such warden or superintendent from all sources, and all expenditures during the month for which the report is made, such report to be made on forms prepared by the commissioner, and a copy thereof shall be filed with the commissioner of finance and administration.

Acts 1919, ch. 39, § 20; impl. am. Acts 1923, ch. 7, §§ 1, 2, 42; Shan. Supp., § 312b26; Code 1932, § 395; impl. am. Acts 1937, ch. 33, § 24; C. Supp. 1950, § 395; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-628.

4-6-118. Estimates — Monthly estimates required.

For the purpose of proper regulation, recording and auditing the various expenditures of the penitentiaries named in §4-6-102, the managing officers thereof shall prepare, and present to the commissioner of correction in triplicate, not less than fifteen (15) days before the first day of each month and on forms furnished by the commissioner, a detailed estimate of all supplies, materials, improvements and money needed during each month.

Acts 1919, ch. 39, § 21; impl. am. Acts 1923, ch. 7, §§ 1, 2, 42; Shan. Supp., § 312b27; Code 1932, § 396; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-629.

4-6-119. Estimates — Review by commissioner of correction.

The commissioner of correction shall review the estimates required by §4-6-118, and in writing advise changes, if any, giving the commissioner's reasons therefor. The officer making the estimate may appeal to the commissioner on any change so advised, due notice of which shall be given such officer.

Acts 1919, ch. 39, § 21; impl. am. Acts 1923, ch. 7, §§ 1, 2, 42; Shan. Supp., § 312b28; Code 1932, § 397; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-630.

4-6-120. Estimates — Staple articles.

Estimates for periods longer than one (1) month may be made in the same manner specified in §4-6-118 by the managing officer for staple articles designated by the commissioner of correction, or for other supplies.

Acts 1919, ch. 39, § 21; impl. am. Acts 1923, ch. 7, §§ 1, 2, 42; Shan. Supp., § 312b29; Code 1932, § 398; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-631.

4-6-121. Estimates — Contingent funds.

Each estimate under §§4-6-118 —4-6-123 may include a contingent fund, not to exceed three percent (3%) of the total amount for maintenance for the period of the estimate, for which no detailed account need be given in the estimate, but such funds shall be drawn upon only in due form as provided in this chapter and under the rules of the commissioners of correction and finance and administration.

Acts 1919, ch. 39, § 21; impl. am. Acts 1923, ch. 7, §§ 1, 2, 42; Shan. Supp., § 312b30; Code 1932, § 399; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-632.

4-6-122. Estimates — Approved copies.

The commissioner of correction shall return to the managing officer one (1) copy of every estimate with the commissioner's approval or alterations in writing, furnishing one (1) copy to the commissioner of finance and administration and filing the third in the office of the commissioner of correction.

Acts 1919, ch. 39, § 21; impl. am. Acts 1923, ch. 7, §§ 1, 2, 42; Shan. Supp., § 312b31; Code 1932, § 400; impl. am. Acts 1937, ch. 33, § 24; C. Supp. 1950, § 400; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 3; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-633.

4-6-123. Estimates — Review by commissioner of finance and administration — Warrants.

The commissioner of finance and administration shall ascertain that the estimates so received do not exceed the respective appropriations and shall draw warrants on the state treasurer monthly for the salary and contingent funds for each institution, which shall be placed in the hands of the managing officer thereof.

Acts 1919, ch. 39, § 21; Shan. Supp., § 312b32; Code 1932, § 401; impl. am. Acts 1937, ch. 33, § 24; C. Supp. 1950, § 401; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-634.

4-6-124. Vouchers — Form and disposition.

Itemized payrolls or vouchers for penitentiaries named in §4-6-102 shall be drawn in triplicate. One (1) copy shall be kept on file by the managing officer, two (2) sent to the commissioner of correction, who upon approval shall send one (1) copy to the commissioner of finance and administration, who shall issue a warrant on the state treasurer thereon.

Acts 1919, ch. 39, § 21; Shan. Supp., § 312b33; Code 1932, § 402; impl. am. Acts 1937, ch. 33, § 24; C. Supp. 1950, § 402; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 3; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-635.

Cross-References. Salary and contingent funds placed in hands of managing officer of institution not later than first of each month, §4-6-127.

4-6-125. Vouchers — Officer's certification.

Each voucher shall contain a statement of the managing officer certifying that:

The supplies and materials purchased conformed to the contract and samples, and the improvements or repairs made or special services rendered were fully satisfactory;

The approving officer was in no way financially interested in the transaction to which the same relates; and

The approving officer has full knowledge of the value of the purchase or work or service in question.

Acts 1919, ch. 39, § 21; Shan. Supp., § 312b34; Code 1932, § 403; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-636.

4-6-126. Vouchers — Form of certificate — Temporary employment payrolls.

The statement provided for in §4-6-125 shall be made according to forms provided by the commissioner of correction; provided, that payrolls for temporary employees in cases of emergency may be made at any time after the services are performed, but all such payrolls shall be certified by the managing officer in the same manner as other vouchers, who shall also certify that each person named in the payroll actually rendered the services for the time and at the rate charged therein.

Acts 1919, ch. 39, § 21; impl. am. Acts 1923, ch. 7, §§ 1, 2, 42; Shan. Supp., § 312b35; Code 1932, § 404; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-637.

4-6-127. Control of funds by treasurer — Disposition of collections.

The state treasurer has charge of all funds under the jurisdiction of the department having control of the penitentiaries named in § 4-6-102, and shall pay out the same only in accordance with this chapter.

The moneys designated and approved by the commissioners of correction and finance and administration as salary and contingent funds in the monthly estimates shall be placed not later than the first day of each month in the hands of the managing officer of each penitentiary or under the managing officer's control, who shall act as treasurer thereof.

Moneys collected from various sources, such as the sale of goods, farm products and all miscellaneous articles, shall be transmitted on or before Monday of each week to the state treasurer, and a detailed statement of such collections made to the commissioner of correction by each managing officer.

Acts 1919, ch. 39, § 22; impl. am. Acts 1923, ch. 7, §§ 1, 2, 42; Shan. Supp., § 312b36; Code 1932, § 405; impl. am. Acts 1937, ch. 33, § 24; C. Supp. 1950, § 405; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 3; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-638.

4-6-128. Appropriations — Classification.

The appropriations for state penal, reformatory or charitable institutions shall be of three (3) classes:

Maintenance;

Ordinary repairs and improvements; and

Specific purposes.

Appropriations for specific purposes shall cover all items for construction, extraordinary repairs and purchase of land and shall be used only for the institutions and purposes specified therein.

Acts 1919, ch. 39, § 23; Shan. Supp., § 312b43; Code 1932, § 412; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-639.

4-6-129. Appropriations — Requests.

Each superintendent and warden of an institution named in §4-6-102 shall, before each session of the general assembly, present to the department of correction an itemized list of appropriations desired for maintenance, repairs, and improvements and special purposes as such superintendent or warden considers necessary for the period of time to be covered by appropriations.

Acts 1919, ch. 39, § 23; impl. am. Acts 1923, ch. 7, §§ 1, 42; Shan. Supp., § 312b37; Code 1932, § 406; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-640.

4-6-130. Appropriations — Tabulation of requests — Presentation to general assembly.

The commissioner having control of such institution shall tabulate such statements with the commissioner's recommendations. It shall then be the duty of the commissioner to present the needs of the institutions to the general assembly.

Acts 1919, ch. 39, § 23; impl. am. Acts 1923, ch. 7, §§ 1, 2, 42; Shan. Supp., § 312b38; Code 1932, § 407; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-641.

4-6-131. Appropriations — Maintenance allowance included in requests.

For the purpose of requesting appropriations from the general assembly, a per capita allowance for the inmates, patients and pupils of each of the institutions shall be arrived at and a total allowance for maintenance asked for on the basis of actual number and estimated increase.

Acts 1919, ch. 39, § 23; Shan. Supp., § 312b39; Code 1932, § 408; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-642.

Compiler's Notes. This section may be affected by §9-1-116, concerning entitlement to funds, absent appropriation.

4-6-132. Appropriations — Special needs itemized in requests.

Every special need shall be itemized and the appropriation asked for that specific purpose.

Acts 1919, ch. 39, § 23; Shan. Supp., § 312b40; Code 1932, § 409; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-643.

4-6-133. Appropriations — Information on requests.

The commissioner of correction shall furnish to the governor and to the general assembly such information as may be required regarding appropriations requested.

Acts 1919, ch. 39, § 23; Shan. Supp., § 312b41; Code 1932, § 410; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-644.

4-6-134. Appropriations — Commissioner's control.

It is the intent that all requests for appropriations for penitentiaries named in §4-6-102 shall be placed under sole control of the commissioner having control of such penitentiary, and that appropriations for the maintenance and for ordinary repairs and improvements thereof shall be made to the commissioner in single sums to be used for the several penitentiaries according to their varying needs.

Acts 1919, ch. 39, § 23; impl. am. Acts 1923, ch. 7, §§ 1, 2, 42; Shan. Supp., § 312b42; Code 1932, § 411; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-645.

4-6-135. Sale of mining or industrial products — Approval of contracts.

All contracts covering the sale or disposal of the output of the state mines, or any factories or industries operated by the state, must be submitted to the commissioner of correction for the commissioner's approval.

All such contracts shall, before the same become effective, be transmitted, with all papers and recommendations, to the commissioner, and shall be effective only from the date of their approval.

Acts 1919, ch. 39, § 14; impl. am. Acts 1923, ch. 7, §§ 1, 2, 42; Shan. Supp., § 312b19; Code 1932, § 388; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-646.

4-6-136. Sale of mining products — Contracts authorized.

The commissioner of correction, with the approval of the commissioner of general services, is hereby authorized to make such disposition by way of sale of slate and other waste products of the coal mines owned and operated by the state as the commissioner of correction may deem fit and proper.

To this end, the commissioner of correction is authorized to enter into contracts for the sale thereof for a period of time not in excess of ten (10) years, such contracts to be upon such terms as may be mutually agreeable to the commissioner of correction, the commissioner of general services and the contracting party.

“Other waste products” as used in subsection (a) includes coal dust.

Acts 1953, ch. 73, § 1 (Williams, § 388.2); impl. am. Acts 1953, ch. 163, § 1; Acts 1955, ch. 22, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1955, ch. 102, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 5; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 5; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-647.

Cross-References. Sale of coal from state mines, except for use of state, prohibited, §41-22-106.

4-6-137. Sale of mining products — Petros mines.

The commissioner of correction, by and with the consent and approval of the governor, is authorized to enter into such contracts for the sale of all coal mined at the state mines, situated at Petros, as are permitted by §41-22-106, the contracts to be made at such prices and covering such periods of time as, in the opinion of the commissioner, will best subserve and protect the interests of the state and the welfare of the inmates. The contracts are to be made and entered into without the necessity of advertising.

Acts 1937, ch. 66, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 388.1; impl. am. Acts 1955, ch. 102, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-648.

4-6-138. Use of inmates for personal gain.

It is unlawful for any person having supervision or control of inmates of the department of correction to use, or allow to be used, such inmates for personal gain or to allow such inmates to work on private property, except as provided by law.

Acts 1953, ch. 180, § 1 (Williams, § 418.2); impl. am. Acts 1955, ch. 102, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-649.

4-6-139. Unlawful use of inmates — Class E felony.

A violation of §4-6-138 is a Class E felony.

Acts 1953, ch. 180, § 2 (Williams, § 418.2); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-650; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 16.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class E felony, §40-35-111.

4-6-140. Records of inmates.

The commissioner of correction shall keep in the commissioner's own office, accessible only to the commissioner's secretary, and proper clerks, except by the commissioner's consent, or the orders of the judge of a court of record, a record showing the name, residence, sex, age, nativity, occupation, condition and date of entrance or commitment of every inmate, patient or pupil in the several institutions governed by the commissioner, the date, cause and terms of discharge, and the conditions of such person at the time of leaving, and also all transfers from one (1) institution to another, and, if dead, the date and cause.

These and such other facts as the commissioner may, from time to time, require shall be furnished by the managing officer of each institution, within ten (10) days after the commitment, entrance, death or discharge of an inmate, patient or pupil, and the managing officer shall make a special report within twenty-four (24) hours thereafter, giving the circumstances as fully as possible.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, all inmate records and the information contained therein shall be open for public inspection. Any information contained in an inmate record that is otherwise made confidential by § 10-7-504, shall remain confidential. The commissioner has the authority to delete from any such record the name of, or any identifying information concerning, any department employee, law enforcement officer or informant or other inmate if, in the commissioner's opinion, public disclosure of such name or information would place the safety of such employee, law enforcement officer, informant or inmate in jeopardy. If the commissioner determines that a name or identifying information cannot be deleted in a manner sufficient to protect any such person, the commissioner may refuse to disclose the document in which such name or identifying information appears.

Acts 1919, ch. 39, § 18; impl. am. Acts 1923, ch. 7, §§ 1, 2, 42; Shan. Supp., § 312b24; Code 1932, § 393; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-651; Acts 1988, ch. 999, § 1.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

Law Reviews.

Updating Tennessee's Public Records Law (Douglas Pierce), 24 No. 5 Tenn. B.J. 24 (1988).

4-6-141. Investigations ordered by governor.

The governor, in the governor's discretion, may at any time order an investigation by the department having control of the management of any penal, reformatory or charitable institution of the state, and, in making such investigation, the commissioner has the power to send for persons and papers, and to administer oaths and affirmations, and the report of such investigation, with the testimony, shall be made to the governor, and shall be submitted by the governor, with the governor's suggestions, to the general assembly.

Acts 1895, ch. 193, § 2; impl. am. Acts 1923, ch. 7, §§ 2, 42; Shan., § 2675; Code 1932, § 4572; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-653.

4-6-142. Interstate traveling expenses.

No expenditures for traveling expenses to other states, or for attending an interstate or national convention or association, shall be made by any member or employee of the department of correction or by any officer of an institution under its control, unless authority is granted by the commissioner of correction, by a writing, stating the purpose and reason therefor.

Acts 1919, ch. 39, § 26; impl. am. Acts 1923, ch. 7, §§ 1, 2, 42; Shan. Supp., § 312b49; Code 1932, § 418; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-654.

4-6-143. Special school district of penal and reformatory institutions.

The penal and reformatory institutions under the control of the commissioner of correction shall be a special school district, which shall be given the same funding consideration for federal funds that special schools within the state are given.

The schools within such institutions shall be under the control of the commissioner who shall serve as the board of education and director of schools for such district.

The schools shall meet the requirements of the law for public schools and rules and regulations of the state board of education.

The commissioner of education may grant waivers for such provisions of the law and regulations with which the schools cannot comply because of the penal and reformatory function of the institutions on an annual basis and in response to the director of education's written request and justification. Such exceptions shall be in writing.

Each teacher in the special school district shall receive annual compensation at a rate of one tenth (1/10) times twelve (12) of the annual compensation in effect in the county in which the respective institution is located or one tenth (1/10) times twelve (12) of the average of the annual compensation of all the counties that are contiguous with the county in which the respective institution is located, whichever is greater, solely out of the state appropriations made to the respective institutions.

This subsection (d) shall not act to reduce the compensation currently paid any teacher in the special school district.

To the extent such resources are available, federal funding resources shall be utilized to meet increased costs resulting from implementation of this subsection (d).

Longevity shall not be paid to teachers in the special school district under both §§ 8-23-206 and 49-5-402.

The commissioner of correction shall develop and implement a plan whereby there shall be sufficient substitute teachers available for temporary service as needed for each school composing the special school district.

Nothing in the language of this section shall be construed as prohibiting any local school district from issuing a diploma to a resident of a state correctional institution, upon certification of the principal of a state correctional school. School records of any juvenile in the correctional programs who is issued a diploma by a local school district shall be maintained by such local school district; provided, that all references to the juvenile's commitment to and treatment by the department of children's services are expunged.

The special school district of penal and reformatory institutions shall have the powers, privileges and authority exercised or capable of exercise by any other school district.

The effect of this section shall not be to provide state funds to the special school district of penal and reformatory institutions through the basic education program (BEP).

Acts 1974, ch. 647, §§ 1-3; 1977, ch. 322, § 1; 1977, ch. 411, § 1; T.C.A., § 4-655; Acts 1981, ch. 437, §§ 1-4; 1985, ch. 450, § 1; 1985 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 5, § 20; 1987, ch. 377, § 1; 1996, ch. 1079, § 16.

Code Commission Notes.

This section may be affected by §9-1-116, concerning entitlement to funds, absent appropriation.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1996, ch. 1079, § 184 provided:

“Any provision of this act, or the application thereof, which is inconsistent with federal law, rule or regulation shall be deemed to be construed as being consistent with federal law, rule or regulation.”

Cross-References. Discipline in special school district of penal and reformatory institutions, title 49, ch. 6, part 44.

Law Reviews.

A Critical Survey of Developments in Tennessee Family Law in 1976-77, VI. Juvenile Courts (Neil Cohen), 45 Tenn. L. Rev. 469 (1978).

4-6-144. Library region for penal and reformatory institutions.

There is created a library region to be composed of the penal and reformatory institutions under the control of the department of correction.

The library shall have a branch library at each of the penal and reformatory institutions.

A librarian shall be appointed who shall serve as a consultant in the state library and archives, public library section.

The commissioner of correction shall ensure that penal and reformatory institutions shall comply with the requirements for libraries as provided in title 10, chapter 5, part 1, except for such provisions of any law, rule or regulation that conflicts with the primary penal and reformatory function of such institutions.

Acts 1974, ch. 764, §§ 1-5; T.C.A., § 4-656.

4-6-145. Information from clerks, superintendents, and jailers.

The clerks of all trial courts exercising criminal jurisdiction, the superintendents of all local workhouses, and all jailers shall, upon the request of the department of correction, furnish to the department pertinent information relating to felony offenders committed to local workhouses and jails, including the names of offenders, offenses committed, sentences imposed, presentence reports and all other information deemed relevant by the department for long-term correctional planning.

Acts 1985 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 5, § 21.

Cross-References. Criminal justice agency statistics, §8-1-110.

4-6-146. Confiscation of contraband.

The commissioner of correction is authorized to permanently confiscate weapons, alcohol, controlled substances, controlled substance analogues, cash and other items that could be detrimental to institutional security or adversely affect an inmate's rehabilitation, if such items have been specifically designated as contraband by the commissioner, and such items are found on the grounds of any institution under the supervision of the department of correction.

“Contraband” does not include cash lawfully in possession of an inmate for allowable purposes within an institution.

Acts 1990, ch. 669, § 2; 2012, ch. 848, § 1.